Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5683.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) The state transportation department, a board of county road commissioners, or a city or village, acting alone or in cooperation with each other or with a federal, state, or local agency having authority to participate in the construction and maintenance of highways, may establish, open, discontinue, vacate, close, alter, improve, maintain, and provide for the public use of limited access highways, subject to section 1(i) of 1925 PA 352, MCL 213.171. (2) The state transportation Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall allow only the installation of vending machines at selected sites on the limited access highway system to dispense food, drink, and other articles that the state transportation department determines appropriate. The state transportation department shall allow only the installation of vending machines at selected travel information centers. Following a 2-year trial period, the state transportation department shall use its discretion with the advice of the commission for the blind bureau of services for blind persons to allow only vending machines at other locations on the limited access highway system. The vending machines shall must be operated solely by the commission for the blind, bureau of services for blind persons, which is designated as the state licensing agency under section 2(a)(5) of chapter 638, 49 Stat. 1559, 20 U.S.C. 107a. 20 USC 107a. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no other commercial enterprise shall enterprises must not be authorized or conducted within or on a property acquired for or designated as a limited access highway. The commission for the blind bureau of services for blind persons shall require evidence of liability insurance and monitor compliance as it pertains to only vending machines in the designated areas, holding harmless and shall hold the state transportation department harmless. (3) In conjunction with the exemption granted by federal law from the restrictions contained in section 111 of title 23 of the United States Code, under 23 U.S.C. USC 111, and as described in the "manual "Manual on uniform traffic control devices Uniform Traffic Control Devices for streets Streets and highways", Highways", U.S. department Department of transportation Transportation and federal highway administration, Federal Highway Administration part 2g (LOGOS), this section does not prohibit the use of facilities located in part on the right-of-way of I-94 in the vicinity of the interchange of I-94 and I-69 business loop/I-94 business loop for the sale of only those articles which that are for export and consumption outside the United States. (4) This section does not prohibit the use of facilities located in the vicinity of the international bridge in the city of Sault Ste. Marie either of the following international bridges for the sale of only those articles which that are for export and consumption outside the United States to the extent that the use is not restricted by federal law: . (a) The International Bridge in the city of Sault Ste. Marie. (b) The Gordie Howe International Bridge in the city of Detroit. (5) This section does not prohibit the operation of customs brokering facilities on state owned property available for that use at the sites of the blue water bridge Blue Water Bridge in Port Huron and the international bridge International Bridge in Sault Ste. Marie. (6) The state transportation department may enter into a lease for facilities described in subsection (3), (4), or (5). , the The revenue from which shall a lease for facilities described in subsection (3), (4), or (5) must be deposited in into the state trunk line fund if attributable to the blue water bridge Blue Water Bridge site or Gordie Howe International Bridge site, or in into the fund created under section 7 of 1954 PA 99, MCL 254.227, if attributable to the international bridge International Bridge site in Sault Ste. Marie. (7) This section does not prohibit the use of facilities located at rest areas or welcome centers to distribute, either directly or through electronic technologies, free travel related information or assistance, or both, to the traveling public if the distribution is approved by the state transportation department. (8) The state transportation department may enter into agreements for the activities described in subsection (7). , the revenue Revenue from which shall the activities described in subsection (7) must be deposited in the state trunk line fund. (9) The state transportation department may enter into agreements to authorize the use of property acquired for or designated as a limited access highway or acquired for or designated for ancillary purposes for the installation, operation, and maintenance of commercial or noncommercial electronic devices and related structures so long as if the electronic devices and related structures are intended to assist in providing travel related information to motorists who subscribe to travel related information services, the public, or the state transportation department. All revenue generated by the agreements shall must be deposited in the state trunk line fund. The state transportation department may accept facilities or in-kind services to be used for public purposes in lieu of, or in addition to, monetary compensation. (10) This section does not prohibit the use of logo signage within the right-of-way of limited access highways. For purposes of this subsection, "logo signage" means a sign containing the trademark or other symbol that identifies a business in a manner and at locations approved by the state transportation department. The state transportation department may enter into agreements to allow logo signage, and any revenue received by the state transportation department under this subsection shall must be deposited into the state trunk line fund. established under section 11 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.661. (11) At the request of a hospital that provides 24-hour emergency care, the state transportation department shall place and maintain signs on all limited access highways that indicate exits that are within 2 miles of that hospital. The signs shall must indicate the name of the hospital or the name of the nonprofit corporation that owns or operates the hospital and the exit number of the exit that is within the 2 miles of the hospital. At least 1 sign shall must be placed for each exit that is within 2 miles of a requesting hospital that provides 24-hour emergency care. The cost of placing and maintaining the sign shall must be paid by the hospital requesting the signs. The state transportation department shall adopt guidelines specifying that specify the size, shape, design, number, and placement of the signs authorized under this subsection. The state transportation department shall not remove signs on limited access highways that exist existed on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection July 23, 2001 and that indicate exits within 10 miles of a hospital that provides 24-hour emergency care but that do not otherwise satisfy the requirements of this subsection. As used in this subsection, "hospital" means a health facility that is licensed under part 215 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.21501 to 333.21568. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Department" means the state transportation department. (b) "Hospital" means a health facility that is licensed as a hospital under article 17 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20101 to 333.22260. (c) "Logo signage" means a sign that contains the trademark or other symbol that identifies a business in a manner and at locations approved by the department. (d) "State trunk line fund" means the state trunk line fund established under section 11 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.661.